Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 16. Psychiatric Treatment of Minors Act.
§ 16.1-345.
Involuntary commitment; criteria.

After observing the minor and considering (i) the recommendations of any treating or examining physician or psychologist licensed in Virginia, if available, (ii) any past actions of the minor, (iii) any past mental health treatment of the minor, (iv) any qualified evaluator’s report, (v) any medical records available, (vi) the preadmission screening report, and (vii) any other evidence that may have been admitted, the court shall order the involuntary commitment of the minor to a mental health facility for treatment for a period not to exceed 90 days if it finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that:

Because of mental illness, the minor (i) presents a serious danger to himself or others to the extent that severe or irremediable injury is likely to result, as evidenced by recent acts or threats or (ii) is experiencing a serious deterioration of his ability to care for himself in a developmentally age-appropriate manner, as evidenced by delusionary thinking or by a significant impairment of functioning in hydration, nutrition, self-protection, or self-control;

The minor is in need of compulsory treatment for a mental illness and is reasonably likely to benefit from the proposed treatment; and

If the court finds that inpatient treatment is not the least restrictive treatment, the court shall consider entering an order for mandatory outpatient treatment pursuant to §

16.1-345.2

.Upon the expiration of an order for involuntary commitment, the minor shall be released unless he is involuntarily admitted by further petition and order of a court, which shall be for a period not to exceed 90 days from the date of the subsequent court order, or the minor or his parent rescinds the objection to inpatient treatment and consents to admission pursuant to §

16.1-338

or subsection D of §

16.1-339

or the minor is ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment pursuant to §

16.1-345.2

.A minor who has been hospitalized while properly detained by a juvenile and domestic relations district court shall be returned to the detention home, shelter care, or other facility approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice by the sheriff serving the jurisdiction where the minor was detained within 24 hours following completion of a period of inpatient treatment, unless the court having jurisdiction over the case orders that the minor be released from custody. However, such a minor shall not be eligible for mandatory outpatient treatment.In conducting an evaluation of a minor who has been properly detained, if the evaluator finds, irrespective of the fact that the minor has been detained, that the minor meets the criteria for involuntary commitment in this section, the evaluator shall recommend that the minor meets the criteria for involuntary commitment.If the parent or parents with whom the minor resides are not willing to approve the proposed commitment, the court shall order inpatient treatment only if it finds, in addition to the criteria specified in this section, that such treatment is necessary to protect the minor’s life, health, safety, or normal development. If a special justice believes that issuance of a removal order or protective order may be in the child’s best interest, the special justice shall report the matter to the local department of social services for the county or city where the minor resides.Upon finding that the best interests of the minor so require, the court may enter an order directing either or both of the minor’s parents to comply with reasonable conditions relating to the minor’s treatment.If the minor is committed to inpatient treatment, such placement shall be in a mental health facility for inpatient treatment designated by the community services board which serves the political subdivision in which the minor was evaluated pursuant to §

16.1-342

. If the community services board does not provide a placement recommendation at the hearing, the minor shall be placed in a mental health facility designated by the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.When a minor has been involuntarily committed pursuant to this section, the judge shall determine, after consideration of information provided by the minor’s treating mental health professional and any involved community services board staff regarding the minor’s dangerousness, whether transportation shall be provided by the sheriff or may be provided by an alternative transportation provider, including a parent, family member, or friend of the minor, a representative of the community services board, a representative of the facility at which the minor was detained pursuant to a temporary detention order, or other alternative transportation provider with personnel trained to provide transportation in a safe manner. If the judge determines that transportation may be provided by an alternative transportation provider, the judge may consult with the proposed alternative transportation provider either in person or via two-way electronic video and audio or telephone communication system to determine whether the proposed alternative transportation provider is available to provide transportation, willing to provide transportation, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner. If the judge finds that the proposed alternative transportation provider is available to provide transportation, willing to provide transportation, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner, the judge may order transportation by the proposed alternative transportation provider. In all other cases, the judge shall order transportation by the sheriff of the jurisdiction where the minor is a resident unless the sheriff’s office of that jurisdiction is located more than 100 road miles from the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the proceedings took place. In cases where the sheriff of the jurisdiction in which the minor is a resident is more than 100 road miles from the nearest boundary of the jurisdiction in which the proceedings took place, it shall be the responsibility of the sheriff of the latter jurisdiction to transport the minor.If the judge determines that the minor requires transportation by the sheriff, the sheriff, as specified in this section shall transport the minor to the proper facility. In no event shall transport commence later than six hours after notification to the sheriff or alternative transportation provider of the judge’s order.If an alternative transportation provider providing transportation of a minor becomes unable to continue providing transportation of the minor at any time after taking custody of the minor, the primary law-enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which the alternative transportation provider is located at the time he becomes unable to continue providing transportation shall take custody of the minor and shall transport the minor to the proper facility. In such cases, if the alternative transportation provider originally authorized to provide transportation is a person other than the minor’s parent, the alternative transportation provider shall notify the minor’s parent (a) that the primary law-enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which he is located has taken custody of the minor and is transporting the minor to the facility of temporary detention and (b) of the name of the law-enforcement officer providing transportation of the minor.No person who provides alternative transportation pursuant to this section shall be liable to the person being transported for any civil damages for ordinary negligence in acts or omissions that result from providing such alternative transportation.

History.

1990, c. 975; 1992, c. 539; 2005, c. 346; 2009, cc. 112, 455, 555, 697, 813, 840; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2015, cc. 297, 308; 2020, cc. 879, 880.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 346 inserted the present fifth through seventh paragraphs and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 112 and 697 are identical, and inserted “or an alternative transportation provider” in the next-to-last sentence of the last paragraph.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and in subdivision 3, rewrote the first paragraph, and in the second paragraph, in the first sentence, deleted “for a criminal offense” following “detained,” “criminal” preceding “case” and added the last sentence and deleted the former fourth paragraph, which read: “In no event shall a minor who has been properly detained by a juvenile and domestic relations district court, and who meets criteria for involuntary commitment, have the right to make application for voluntary admission and treatment as may otherwise be provided for in this section.”

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” near the middle of the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical and rewrote the first paragraph; added the second paragraph; in the third paragraph, inserted “shelter care, or other facility approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice by the sheriff serving the jurisdiction where the minor was detained within 24 hours”; rewrote the fifth paragraph, in the seventh paragraph, deleted the last two sentences, which read: “The judge shall order the sheriff or an alternative transportation provider to transport the minor to the designated mental health facility as specified in §

37.2-829

. The transportation of the committed minor by the minor’s parent may be authorized at the discretion of the judge”; and added the last two paragraphs.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 297 and 308 are identical, and added the last paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 879 and 880 are identical, and inserted the penultimate paragraph.

§ 16.1-345.1.
Use of electronic communication.

Petitions and orders for emergency custody, temporary detention, and involuntary commitment of minors pursuant to this article may be filed, issued, served, or executed by electronic means, with or without the use of two-way electronic video and audio communication, and returned in the same manner with the same force, effect, and authority as an original document. All signatures thereon shall be treated as original signatures.

Any judge may conduct proceedings pursuant to this article using any two-way electronic video and audio communication system to provide for the appearance of any parties and witnesses. Any two-way electronic video and audio communication system used to conduct a proceeding shall meet the standards set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

. When a witness whose testimony would be helpful to the conduct of the proceeding is not able to be physically present, his testimony may be received using a telephonic communication system.

History.

2005, c. 51; 2007, cc. 500, 897; 2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 500 and 897 are identical, and deleted “juvenile and domestic relations court” preceding “judge” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and substituted “this article” for “§

16.1-344

” in the first sentence in subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825, in subsection A, deleted “pursuant to §

37.2-808

” following “emergency custody,” “pursuant to §

37.2-809

” following “ temporary detention,” and “pursuant to §

16.1-341

” following “involuntary commitment,” and inserted “pursuant to this article.”

§ 16.1-345.2.
Mandatory outpatient treatment; criteria; orders.

After observing the minor and considering (i) the recommendations of any treating or examining physician or psychologist licensed in Virginia, if available, (ii) any past actions of the minor, (iii) any past mental health treatment of the minor, (iv) any evaluation of the minor, (v) any medical records available, (vi) the preadmission screening report, and (vii) any other relevant evidence that may have been admitted, the court shall order that the minor be admitted involuntarily to mandatory outpatient treatment for a period not to exceed 90 days if it finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that:

Because of mental illness, the minor (i) presents a serious danger to himself or others to the extent that severe or irremediable injury is likely to result, as evidenced by recent acts or threats or (ii) is experiencing a serious deterioration of his ability to care for himself in a developmentally age-appropriate manner, as evidenced by delusionary thinking or by a significant impairment of functioning in hydration, nutrition, self-protection, or self-control;

The minor is in need of compulsory treatment for a mental illness and is reasonably likely to benefit from the proposed treatment;

Less restrictive alternatives to involuntary inpatient treatment that would offer an opportunity for improvement of his condition have been investigated and are determined to be appropriate;

The minor, if 14 years of age or older, and his parents (i) have sufficient capacity to understand the stipulations of the minor’s treatment, (ii) have expressed an interest in the minor’s living in the community and have agreed to abide by the minor’s treatment plan, and (iii) are deemed to have the capacity to comply with the treatment plan and understand and adhere to conditions and requirements of the treatment and services; and

The ordered treatment can be delivered on an outpatient basis by the community services board or a designated provider.Less restrictive alternatives shall not be determined to be appropriate unless the services are actually available in the community and providers of the services have actually agreed to deliver the services.

Mandatory outpatient treatment may include day treatment in a hospital, night treatment in a hospital, or other appropriate course of treatment as may be necessary to meet the needs of the minor. The community services board serving the area in which the minor resides shall recommend a specific course of treatment and programs for the provision of mandatory outpatient treatment. Upon expiration of an order for mandatory outpatient treatment, the minor shall be released from the requirements of the order unless the order is continued in accordance with §

16.1-345.5

.

Any order for mandatory outpatient treatment shall include an initial mandatory outpatient treatment plan developed by the community services board serving the area in which the minor resides. The plan shall, at a minimum, (i) identify the specific services to be provided, (ii) identify the provider who has agreed to provide each service, (iii) describe the arrangements made for the initial in-person appointment or contact with each service provider, and (iv) include any other relevant information that may be available regarding the mandatory outpatient treatment ordered. The order shall require the community services board to monitor the implementation of the mandatory outpatient treatment plan and report any material noncompliance to the court.

No later than five business days after an order for mandatory outpatient treatment has been entered pursuant to this section, the community services board that is responsible for monitoring compliance with the order shall file a comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan. The comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan shall (i) identify the specific type, amount, duration, and frequency of each service to be provided to the minor, (ii) identify the provider that has agreed to provide each service included in the plan, (iii) certify that the services are the most appropriate and least restrictive treatment available for the minor, (iv) certify that each provider has complied and continues to comply with applicable provisions of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services’ licensing regulations, (v) be developed with the fullest involvement and participation of the minor and his parents and reflect their preferences to the greatest extent possible to support the minor’s recovery and self-determination, (vi) specify the particular conditions with which the minor shall be required to comply, and (vii) describe how the community services board shall monitor the minor’s compliance with the plan and report any material noncompliance with the plan. The minor shall be involved in the preparation of the plan to the maximum feasible extent consistent with his ability to understand and participate, and the minor’s family shall be involved to the maximum extent consistent with the minor’s treatment needs. The community services board shall submit the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan to the court for approval. Upon approval by the court, the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan shall be filed with the court and incorporated into the order of mandatory outpatient treatment. Any subsequent substantive modifications to the plan shall be filed with the court for review and attached to any order for mandatory outpatient treatment.

If the community services board responsible for developing the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan determines that the services necessary for the treatment of the minor’s mental illness are not available or cannot be provided to the minor in accordance with the order for mandatory outpatient treatment, it shall notify the court within five business days of the entry of the order for mandatory outpatient treatment. Within five business days of receiving such notice, the judge, after notice to the minor, the minor’s attorney, and the community services board responsible for developing the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan, shall hold a hearing pursuant to §

16.1-345.4

.

Upon entry of any order for mandatory outpatient treatment, the clerk of the court shall provide a copy of the order to the minor who is the subject of the order, his parents, his attorney, his guardian ad litem, and the community services board required to monitor his compliance with the plan. The community services board shall acknowledge receipt of the order to the clerk of the court on a form established by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court and provided by the court for this purpose.

After entry of any order for mandatory outpatient treatment if the court that entered the order is not the juvenile and domestic relations district court for the jurisdiction in which the minor resides, it shall transfer jurisdiction of the case to the court where the minor resides.

History.

2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical and in subsection A, inserted “After observing the minor and considering (i) the recommendations of any treating or examining physician or psychologist licensed in Virginia, if available, (ii) any past actions of the minor, (iii) any past mental health treatment of the minor, (iv) any evaluation of the minor, (v) any medical records available, (vi) the preadmission screening report, and (vii) any other relevant evidence that may have been admitted” at the beginning; and in subsection D, made a minor stylistic change.

§ 16.1-345.3.
Monitoring mandatory outpatient treatment; motion for review.

The community services board where the minor resides shall monitor the minor’s compliance with the mandatory outpatient treatment plan ordered by the court pursuant to §

16.1-345.2

. Monitoring compliance shall include (i) contacting the service providers to determine if the minor is complying with the mandatory outpatient treatment order and (ii) notifying the court of the minor’s material noncompliance with the mandatory outpatient treatment order. Providers of services identified in the plan shall report any material noncompliance to the community services board.

If the community services board determines that the minor materially failed to comply with the order, it shall file with the juvenile and domestic relations district court for the jurisdiction in which the minor resides a motion for review of the mandatory outpatient treatment order as provided in §

16.1-345.4

. The community services board shall file the motion for review of the mandatory outpatient treatment order within three business days of making that determination, or within 24 hours if the minor is being detained under a temporary detention order, and shall recommend an appropriate disposition. Copies of the motion for review shall be sent to the minor, his parents, his attorney, and his guardian ad litem.

If the community services board determines that the minor is not materially complying with the mandatory outpatient treatment order or for any other reason, and that because of mental illness, the minor (i) presents a serious danger to himself or others to the extent that severe or irremediable injury is likely to result, as evidenced by recent acts or threats or (ii) is experiencing a serious deterioration of his ability to care for himself in a developmentally age-appropriate manner, as evidenced by delusionary thinking or by a significant impairment of functioning in hydration, nutrition, self-protection, or self-control, it shall immediately request that the magistrate issue an emergency custody order pursuant to §

16.1-340

or a temporary detention order pursuant to §

16.1-340.1

.

If the community services board determines at any time prior to the expiration of the mandatory outpatient treatment order that the minor has complied with the order and that continued mandatory outpatient treatment is no longer necessary, it shall file a motion to review the order with the juvenile and domestic relations district court for the jurisdiction in which the minor resides. The court shall schedule a hearing and provide notice of the hearing in accordance with subsection A of §

16.1-345.4

.

History.

2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by cc. 778 and 825 are identical and in subsection C, inserted “pursuant to §

16.1-340

” and substituted “§

16.1-340

.1” for “§ 16.1-340.”

§ 16.1-345.4.
Court review of mandatory outpatient treatment plan.

The juvenile and domestic relations district court judge shall hold a hearing within 15 days after receiving the motion for review of the mandatory outpatient treatment plan; however, if the fifteenth day is a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the hearing shall be held on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed. If the minor is being detained under a temporary detention order, the hearing shall be scheduled within the same time frame provided for a commitment hearing under §

16.1-341

. The clerk shall provide notice of the hearing to the minor, his parents, the community services board, all treatment providers listed in the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment order, and the original petitioner for the minor’s involuntary treatment. If the minor is not represented by counsel, the judge shall appoint an attorney to represent the minor in this hearing and any subsequent hearings under §

16.1-345.5

, giving consideration to appointing the attorney who represented the minor at the proceeding that resulted in the issuance of the mandatory outpatient treatment order. The judge shall also appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor. The community services board shall offer to arrange the minor’s transportation to the hearing if the minor is not detained and has no other source of transportation.

If requested by the minor’s parents, the community services board, a treatment provider listed in the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan, or the original petitioner for the minor’s involuntary treatment, the juvenile and domestic relations district court judge may order an evaluation and appoint a qualified evaluator in accordance with §

16.1-342

who shall personally examine the minor and certify to the court whether or not he has probable cause to believe that the minor meets the criteria for involuntary inpatient treatment or mandatory outpatient treatment as specified in §

16.1-345

and subsection A of §

16.1-345.2

. The evaluator’s report may be admitted into evidence without the appearance of the evaluator at the hearing if not objected to by the minor or his attorney. If the minor is not detained in an inpatient facility, the community services board shall arrange for the minor to be examined at a convenient location and time. The community services board shall offer to arrange for the minor’s transportation to the examination, if the minor has no other source of transportation. If the minor refuses or fails to appear, the community services board shall notify the court, and the court shall issue a mandatory examination order and a civil show cause summons. The return date for the civil show cause summons shall be set on a date prior to the review hearing scheduled pursuant to subsection A, and the examination of the minor shall be conducted immediately after the hearing thereon, but in no event shall the period for the examination exceed eight hours.

If the minor fails to appear for the hearing, the juvenile and domestic relations district court judge shall, after consideration of any evidence from the minor, from his parents, from the community services board, or from any treatment provider identified in the mandatory outpatient treatment plan regarding why the minor failed to appear at the hearing, either (i) reschedule the hearing pursuant to subsection A, (ii) issue an emergency custody order pursuant to §

16.1-340

, or (iii) issue a temporary detention order pursuant to §

16.1-340

.1.

After hearing the evidence regarding the minor’s material noncompliance with the mandatory outpatient treatment order and the minor’s current condition, and any other relevant information referenced in §

16.1-345

and subsection A of §

16.1-345

.2, the juvenile and domestic relations district court judge may make one of the following dispositions:

Upon finding by clear and convincing evidence that the minor meets the criteria for involuntary admission and treatment specified in §

16.1-345

, the judge shall order the minor’s involuntary admission to a facility designated by the community services board for a period of treatment not to exceed 30 days;

Upon finding that the minor continues to meet the criteria for mandatory outpatient treatment specified in subsection A of §

16.1-345.2

, and that a continued period of mandatory outpatient treatment appears warranted, the judge may renew the order for mandatory outpatient treatment, making any necessary modifications that are acceptable to the community services board or treatment provider responsible for the minor’s treatment. In determining the appropriateness of outpatient treatment, the court may consider the minor’s material noncompliance with the previous mandatory treatment order; or

Upon finding that neither of the above dispositions is appropriate, the judge may rescind the order for mandatory outpatient treatment.Upon entry of an order for involuntary inpatient admission, transportation shall be provided in accordance with § 16.1-345.

For the purposes of this section, “juvenile and domestic relations district court judge” shall not include a special justice as authorized by §

37.2-803

.

History.

2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2014, cc. 691, 761.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “16.1-341” for “16.1-340”; in subsection B, substituted “a qualified evaluator” for “an evaluator” and “return date for the civil show cause summons shall be set on a date prior to the review hearing scheduled pursuant to subsection A, and the examination of the minor shall be conducted immediately after the hearing thereon” for “minor shall remain in custody until a temporary detention order is issued or until the minor is released” and inserted “for the examination” near the end; in subsection C, substituted “16.1-340.1” for “16.1-340”; and in subsection D, inserted “referenced in §

16.1-345

and subsection A of §

16.1-345.2

.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 691, in subsection A, inserted “or day on which the court is lawfully closed” twice in the first sentence and made related changes; and in subsection B substituted “eight hours” for “four hours” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2014 amendment by c. 761, in subsection B, substituted “eight hours” for “four hours” at the end of the last sentence.

§ 16.1-345.5.
Continuation of mandatory outpatient treatment order.

At any time within 30 days prior to the expiration of a mandatory outpatient treatment order, the community services board that is required to monitor the minor’s compliance with the order may file with the juvenile and domestic relations district court for the jurisdiction in which the minor resides a motion for review to continue the order for a period not to exceed 90 days.

The court shall grant the motion for review and enter an appropriate order without further hearing if it is joined by (i) the minor’s parents and the minor if he is 14 years of age or older, or (ii) the minor’s parents if the minor is younger than 14 years of age. If the minor’s parents and the minor, if necessary, do not join the motion, the court shall schedule a hearing and provide notice of the hearing in accordance with subsection A of §

16.1-345.4

.

Upon receipt of the motion for review, the court shall appoint a qualified evaluator who shall personally examine the minor pursuant to §

16.1-342

. The community services board required to monitor the minor’s compliance with the mandatory outpatient treatment order shall provide a preadmission screening report as required in §

16.1-340.4

.

After observing the minor, reviewing the preadmission screening report, and considering the appointed qualified evaluator’s report and any other relevant evidence referenced in §

16.1-345

and subsection A of §

16.1-345.2

, the court may make one of the dispositions specified in subsection D of §

16.1-345.4

. If the court finds that a continued period of mandatory outpatient treatment is warranted, it may continue the order for a period not to exceed 90 days. Any order of mandatory outpatient treatment that is in effect at the time a motion for review for the continuation of the order is filed shall remain in effect until the court enters a subsequent order in the case.

For the purposes of this section, the “court” shall not include a special justice as authorized in §

37.2-803

.

History.

2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and added the last sentence of subsection C; and in subsection D, inserted “reviewing the preadmission screening report” and “referenced in §

16.1-345

and subsection A of §

16.1-345.2

.”

§ 16.1-345.6.
Appeal of final order.

The minor shall have the right to appeal any final order committing the minor or ordering the minor to mandatory outpatient treatment to the circuit court in the jurisdiction where the minor was committed, hospitalized pursuant to the commitment order, or ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment. Venue shall be in the circuit court having jurisdiction within the territory of the court that issued the final order. The circuit court may transfer the case upon a finding that another forum is more convenient. The appeal shall be heard de novo by the circuit court in accordance with the provisions set forth in this article. Any order of the circuit court shall not extend the period of commitment or mandatory outpatient treatment set forth in the order appealed from.

Notice of an appeal shall be filed within 10 days from the date of the order. The appeal shall be given priority over all other pending matters before the circuit court and heard as soon as possible, notwithstanding §

19.2-241

regarding the time within which the court shall set criminal cases for trial. A petition for or the pendency of an appeal shall not suspend any order unless so ordered by the court, however a minor may be released after a petition for or during the pendency of an appeal pursuant to subsection B of §

16.1-346

. The clerk of the court from which the appeal is taken shall immediately transmit the record to the clerk of the appellate court. The clerk of the circuit court shall provide written notification of the appeal to the person who initiated the petition under this article in accordance with procedures set forth in §

16.1-112

.

The juvenile and domestic relations district court shall appoint an attorney and a guardian ad litem to represent any minor desiring to appeal who is not already represented.

History.

2010, cc. 778, 825.

§ 16.1-346.
Treatment plans; periodic review of status.

Within 10 days of commitment ordered under §

16.1-345

, the director of the facility to which the minor was committed shall ensure that an individualized plan of treatment has been prepared by the provider responsible for the minor’s treatment and, if applicable, has been communicated to the parent. The minor shall be involved in the preparation of the plan to the maximum feasible extent consistent with his ability to understand and participate, and the minor’s family shall be involved to the maximum extent consistent with the minor’s treatment needs. The plan shall include a preliminary plan for placement and aftercare upon completion of inpatient treatment and shall include specific behavioral and emotional goals against which the success of treatment may be measured. A copy of the plan shall be provided to the minor, his parents, and, upon request, to his attorney and his guardian ad litem.

A minor committed to inpatient treatment shall be discharged from the facility when he no longer meets the commitment criteria as determined by appropriate hospital medical staff review.

History.

1990, c. 975; 1991, c. 159; 2010, cc. 778, 825.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical and in subsection A, substituted “his parents, and, upon request, to his attorney and his guardian ad litem” for “and to, his parents” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 16.1-346.1.
Discharge plan.

Prior to discharge of any minor admitted to inpatient treatment, including a minor in detention or shelter care pursuant to an order of a juvenile and domestic relations district court, a discharge plan shall be formulated, provided and explained to the minor, and copies thereof shall be sent (i) to the minor’s parents or (ii) if the minor is in the custody of the local department of social services, to the department’s director or the director’s designee or (iii) to the minor’s parents and (a) if the juvenile is to be housed in a detention home upon discharge, to the court in which the petition has been filed and the facility superintendent, or (b) if the minor is in custody of the local department of social services, to the department. A copy of the plan shall also be provided, upon request, to the minor’s attorney and guardian ad litem. If the minor was admitted to a state facility, the discharge plan shall be contained in a uniform discharge document developed by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services. The plan shall, at a minimum, (i) specify the services required by the released minor in the community to meet his needs for treatment, housing, nutrition, physical care, and safety; (ii) specify any income subsidies for which the minor is eligible; (iii) identify all local and state agencies which will be involved in providing treatment and support to the minor; and (iv) specify services which would be appropriate for the minor’s treatment and support in the community but which are currently unavailable. A minor in detention or shelter care prior to admission to inpatient treatment shall be returned to the detention home, shelter care, or other facility approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice within 24 hours by the sheriff serving the jurisdiction where the minor was detained upon release from the treating facility, unless the juvenile and domestic relations district court having jurisdiction over the case has provided written authorization for release of the minor, prior to the scheduled date of release.

History.

1991, c. 159; 1995, c. 304; 2005, cc. 346, 716; 2010, cc. 778, 825.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 346 inserted “including a minor in detention or shelter care pursuant to an order of a juvenile and domestic relations district court” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2005 amendment by c. 716, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “discharge” for “predischarge” two times, “37.2-837” for “37.1-98.2,” “minor” for “patient,” and “his” for “the minor’s” preceding “needs for treatment.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and added the second sentence and substituted “contained in a uniform discharge document developed by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “prepared and implemented in accordance with §

37.2-837

” and “shelter care, or other facility approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice within 24 hours by the sheriff serving the jurisdiction where the minor was detained” for “by appropriate law enforcement.”

§ 16.1-347.
Fees and expenses for qualified evaluators.

Every qualified evaluator appointed by the court to conduct an evaluation pursuant to this article who is not regularly employed by the Commonwealth shall be compensated for fees and expenses as provided in §

37.2-804

.

History.

1990, c. 975; 2010, cc. 778, 825.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and substituted “this article” for “§

16.1-342

” and deleted the last sentence, which read: “The cost of an evaluation conducted pursuant to §

16.1-338

or §

16.1-339

shall be considered for all purposes a cost of treatment and shall be compensated as a professional fee billed by or on behalf of the qualified evaluator to the patient or any responsible third party payor.”

§ 16.1-348.
Availability of judge.

The chief judge of every juvenile and domestic relations district court shall establish and require that a judge be available seven days a week, 24 hours a day, for the purpose of performing the duties established by this article. Such judge shall have the authority to perform the duties established by this article.

History.

1990, c. 975; 2005, c. 716; 2007, cc. 500, 897.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 716, effective October 1, 2005, deleted “as defined in §

37.1-1

” preceding “be available” and substituted “24” for “twenty-four.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 500 and 897 are identical, and added the last sentence.